Utah statutes.
53A-13-206.   Appropriations from Automobile Driver Education Tax Account.

There is appropriated to the State Board of Education from the Automobile Driver Education Tax Account, annually, all money in the account, in excess of the expense of administering the collection of the tax, for use and distribution in the administration and maintenance of driver education classes and programs with respect to classes offered in the school district and the establishment of experimental programs, including the purchasing of equipment, by the board.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

